Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB55.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Small Business Fee Exemption Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business fee." A fee required to be paid to the Commonwealth or a political subdivision for starting or opening a business within this Commonwealth. The term does not include a fee for maintaining licensure or other requirement for continuing to operate a business."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Disadvantaged business." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 2102 1234567891011121314151617 (relating to definitions)."Microbusiness." A business that is a sole proprietorship, partnership or corporation which has five or less employees."Minority-owned business." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 2201 (relating to definitions)."Service-disabled veteran-owned small business." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 9601 (relating to definitions)."Small business." A business which is independently owned and:(1) Employs 100 or fewer employees.(2) Had annual revenues of less than $10,000,000 in each of the last three tax years.(3) Is not dominant in its field."Woman-owned business." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 2201.Section 3. Exemption.(a) Full payment exemption.--In addition to the exemption provided to a veteran-owned or reservist-owned small business under 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 96 Subch. C (relating to business fee exemption), the following shall be exempt from the payment of a business fee:(1) A woman-owned small business.(2) A service-disabled veteran-owned small business.(3) A minority-owned small business.(4) A disadvantaged small business.(5) A microbusiness.(b) Partial payment exemption.--A small business other than a small business eligible for a full exemption under subsection (a) shall be exempt from the payment of 50% of a business fee.(c) Proof.--A person applying for the exemption under subsection (a) or (b) shall, at the time of filing a business 20250HB0055PN0045 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application, provide the department or licensing authority of a political subdivision with documentation of the person's eligibility for the exemption in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(d) Status.--The department or licensing authority of a political subdivision, in consultation with other Commonwealth agencies, may determine an applicant's status as a small business eligible for an exemption under this section.Section 4. Offenses.(a) Offense defined.--A person who fraudulently obtains a business fee exemption under section 3 commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(b) Further defined.--A person assigning, transferring or attempting to assign or transfer a business fee exemption or using or attempting to use a business fee exemption contrary to this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 5. Reporting.The department shall annually determine the total number of business fee exemptions applied for and issued and the total dollar amount of the exemptions under this act and submit a report to the chair and minority chair of the Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives. The report may be submitted electronically.Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply to business applications for new businesses filed on or after July 1, 2025.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0055PN0045 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930